Massachusetts, session 194th, H2102.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 58 of Chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the fourth paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following:
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an employee who, while in the
performance of duty, receives bodily injuries resulting from acts of violence of patients or
prisoners in the employee's custody or, in the case of a court officer, receives bodily injuries
resulting from acts of violence in the courtroom or public areas, holding areas and other
designated areas of the courthouse or from subduing or apprehending escaping prisoners or, in
the case of a correctional employee, receives bodily injury as a result of acts of violence either in
the performance of normal duty or while performing assigned duty outside of a correctional
of 2

facility and who as a result of such injury would be entitled to benefits under said chapter one
hundred and fifty-two, shall be paid the difference between the weekly cash benefits to which he
would be entitled under said chapter one hundred and fifty-two and his regular salary, without
such absence being charged against available sick leave credits, even if such absence may be for
less than eight calendar days' duration.
SECTION 2: Chapter 152 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following section:
SECTION 86: Correctional employees receiving bodily injuries resulting from acts of
violence either in performance of normal duty or while performing assigned duty outside of a
correctional facility shall be presumed eligible for benefits under chapter 152.
of 2